apertium-dan-nor.nno.dix
<pardef n="gl/eppe__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>oppen</l>  <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oppen</l> <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oppe</l>  <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oppi</l>  <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>opne</l>  <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>opne</l>  <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>eppande</l><r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>epp</l>   <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>epp</l><r>eppe</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>eppast</l><r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oppe</l>  <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oppi</l>  <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>epp</l>   <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>app</l>   <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="y__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>dd</l>    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>dd</l>    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>tt</l>    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>dde</l>   <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>dde</l>   <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ande</l>  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>y</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>y</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ast</l>   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>dd</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>tt</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>r</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>dde</l>   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="k/ome__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>omen</l>   <r>ome<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ommi</l>  <r>ome<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>omen</l>  <r>ome<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ommen</l> <r>ome<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ome</l>   <r>ome<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>omi</l>   <r>ome<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>omme</l>  <r>ome<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ommi</l>  <r>ome<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>omne</l>  <r>ome<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>omne</l>  <r>ome<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>om</l>    <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>om</l><r>ome</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>omm</l>  <r>ome</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>omast</l> <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ome</l>   <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>omi</l>   <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>omme</l>  <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ommi</l>  <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>jem</l>   <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>om</l>    <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>omande</l><r>ome<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ommande</l><r>ome<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ommast</l><r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="skv/elpe__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>olpen</l>  <r>elpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>olpen</l> <r>elpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>olpe</l>  <r>elpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>olpi</l>  <r>elpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>olpne</l> <r>elpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>olpne</l> <r>elpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>elpande</l><r>elpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>elp</l>   <r>elpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>elp</l><r>elpe</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>elpast</l><r>elpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>olpe</l>  <r>elpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>olpi</l>  <r>elpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>elp</l>   <r>elpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>alp</l>   <r>elpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="d/ølje__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>uld</l>   <r>ølje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>uld</l>   <r>ølje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ult</l>   <r>ølje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ulde</l>  <r>ølje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ulde</l>  <r>ølje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>øljande</l><r>ølje<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>øl</l>    <r>ølje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ølj</l><r>ølje</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>øljast</l><r>ølje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>uld</l>   <r>ølje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ult</l>   <r>ølje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>øl</l>    <r>ølje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ulde</l>  <r>ølje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ulte</l><r>ølje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="y">               <i>y</i><par n="y__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kome">            <i>k</i><par n="k/ome__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gleppe"><i>gl</i><par n="gl/eppe__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forkome">            <i>fork</i><par n="k/ome__vblex_adj"/></e>
